Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2254YH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 334 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. Employ chaplains, or engage chaplains to 3 serve without compensation or remuneration, in the same manner 4 as a school district under section 279.87. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. A charter school or innovation zone 8 school may employ chaplains, or engage chaplains to serve 9 without compensation or remuneration, in the same manner as a 10 school district under section 279.87. 11 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 School chaplains. 12 1. The board of directors of a school district may employ a 13 chaplain, or engage a chaplain to serve without compensation or 14 remuneration, to provide support, services, and programs for 15 students as assigned by the board of directors of the school 16 district. 17 2. The board of directors of a school district shall not 18 require a chaplain employed or engaged under this section to 19 have a license, endorsement, certification, authorization, or 20 statement of recognition issued by the board of educational 21 examiners. 22 3. The procedure for background investigations and 23 termination established in section 279.69 shall apply to 24 chaplains employed or engaged under this section. 25 4. The board of directors of a school district shall not 26 require or coerce a student to utilize the support, services, 27 or programs provided by a chaplain who is employed or engaged 28 by the board of directors of the school district pursuant to 29 this section. 30